Nevada, session 83, AB403.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. The Legislature hereby finds that each exemption
provided by this act from any excise tax on the sale, storage, use or
consumption of tangible personal property sold at retail:
1. Will achieve a bona fide social or economic purpose and that
the benefits of the exemption are expected to exceed any adverse
effect of the exemption on the provision of services to the public by
the State or a local government that would otherwise receive
revenue from the tax from which the exemption would be granted;
and
2. Will not impair adversely the ability of the State or a local
government to pay, when due, all interest and principal on any
outstanding bonds or any other obligations for which revenue from
the tax from which the exemption would be granted was pledged.
Sec. 2. At the General Election on November 3, 2026, a
proposal must be submitted to the registered voters of this State to
amend the Sales and Use Tax Act, which was enacted by the 47th
Session of the Legislature of the State of Nevada and approved by
the Governor in 1955, and subsequently approved by the people of
this State at the General Election held on November 6, 1956.
Sec. 3. At the time and in the manner provided by law, the
Secretary of State shall transmit the proposed act to the several
county clerks, and the county clerks shall cause it to be published
and posted as provided by law.
Sec. 4. The proclamation and notice to the voters given by the
county clerks pursuant to law must be in substantially the following
form:
Notice is hereby given that at the General Election on
November 3, 2026, a question will appear on the ballot for the
adoption or rejection by the registered voters of the State of the
following proposed act:
AN ACT to amend an Act entitled “An Act to provide
revenue for the State of Nevada; providing for sales
and use taxes; providing for the manner of collection;
-
*AB403_R1*

– 3 –
defining certain terms; providing penalties for
violation, and other matters properly relating thereto.”
approved March 29, 1955, as amended.

THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEVADA
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:

Section 1. The above entitled Act, being chapter 397,
Statutes of Nevada 1955, at page 762, is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to be designated as section 18.3,
immediately following section 18.2, to read as follows:
Sec. 18.3 “Portable electronic” means an electronic
device that is portable in nature and its accessories.
Sec. 2. Section 11 of the above-entitled Act, being
chapter 397, Statutes of Nevada 1955, at page 764, and
amended by chapter 400, Statutes of Nevada 2003, at page
2397, and amended by chapter 484, Statutes of Nevada 2005,
at page 2493, is hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 11. 1. “Sales price” means the total amount
for which tangible property is sold, valued in money,
whether paid in money or otherwise, without any
deduction on account of any of the following:
(a) The cost of the property sold.
(b) The cost of materials used, labor or service cost,
interest charged, losses, or any other expenses.
(c) The cost of transportation of the property before its
purchase.
2. The total amount for which property is sold
includes all of the following:
(a) Any services that are a part of the sale.
(b) Any amount for which credit is given to the
purchaser by the seller.
3. “Sales price” does not include any of the
following:
(a) Cash discounts allowed and taken on sales.
(b) The amount charged for property returned by
customers when the entire amount charged therefor is
refunded either in cash or credit, except that this exclusion
does not apply in any instance when the customer, in order
to obtain the refund, is required to purchase other property
at a price greater than the amount charged for the property
that is returned.
(c) The amount charged for labor or services rendered
in installing or applying the property sold.
-
*AB403_R1*

– 4 –
(d) The amount of any tax, not including any
manufacturers’ or importers’ excise tax, imposed by the
United States upon or with respect to retail sales, whether
imposed upon the retailer or consumer.
(e) The amount of any allowance against the selling
price given by a retailer for the value of a used vehicle
which is taken in trade on the purchase of another vehicle.
(f) The amount of any allowance against the selling
price given by a retailer for the value of a used portable
electronic which is taken in trade on the purchase of
another portable electronic if:
(1) The amount of the allowance is known and
provided in full to the customer at the time of the
purchase;
(2) The amount of the allowance is stated
separately on the sales receipt; and
(3) The trade-in of the used portable electronic
and the purchase of another portable electronic occur as
part of a single, contemporaneous transaction.
Sec. 3. Section 12 of the above entitled Act, being
chapter 397, Statutes of Nevada 1955, at page 764, and
amended by chapter 400, Statutes of Nevada 2003, at page
2398, and amended by chapter 484, Statutes of Nevada 2005,
at page 2494, is hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 12. 1. “Gross receipts” means the total
amount of the sale or lease or rental price, as the case may
be, of the retail sales of retailers, valued in money,
whether received in money or otherwise, without any
deduction on account of any of the following:
(a) The cost of the property sold. However, in
accordance with such rules and regulations as the Tax
Commission may prescribe, a deduction may be taken if
the retailer has purchased property for some other purpose
than resale, has reimbursed his vendor for tax which the
vendor is required to pay to the State or has paid the use
tax with respect to the property, and has resold the
property before making any use of the property other than
retention, demonstration or display while holding it for
sale in the regular course of business. If such a deduction
is taken by the retailer, no refund or credit will be allowed
to his vendor with respect to the sale of the property.
(b) The cost of the materials used, labor or service
cost, interest paid, losses or any other expense.
(c) The cost of transportation of the property before its
sale to the purchaser.
-
*AB403_R1*

– 5 –
2. The total amount of the sale or lease or rental price
includes all of the following:
(a) Any services that are a part of the sale.
(b) All receipts, cash, credits and property of any kind.
(c) Any amount for which credit is allowed by the
seller to the purchaser.
3. “Gross receipts” does not include any of the
following:
(a) Cash discounts allowed and taken on sales.
(b) The sale price of property returned by customers
when the full sale price is refunded either in cash or credit,
but this exclusion does not apply in any instance when the
customer, in order to obtain the refund, is required to
purchase other property at a price greater than the amount
charged for the property that is returned.
(c) The price received for labor or services used in
installing or applying the property sold.
(d) The amount of any tax, not including any
manufacturers’ or importers’ excise tax, imposed by the
United States upon or with respect to retail sales, whether
imposed upon the retailer or the consumer.
(e) The amount of any allowance against the selling
price given by a retailer for the value of a used vehicle
which is taken in trade on the purchase of another vehicle.
(f) The amount of any allowance against the selling
price given by a retailer for the value of a used portable
electronic which is taken in trade on the purchase of
another portable electronic if:
(1) The amount of the allowance is known and
provided in full to the customer at the time of the
purchase;
(2) The amount of the allowance is stated
separately on the sales receipt; and
(3) The trade-in of the used portable electronic
and the purchase of another portable electronic occur as
part of a single, contemporaneous transaction.
4. For purposes of the sales tax, if the retailers
establish to the satisfaction of the Tax Commission that
the sales tax has been added to the total amount of the sale
price and has not been absorbed by them, the total amount
of the sale price shall be deemed to be the amount
received exclusive of the tax imposed.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective on January 1, 2027,
and expires by limitation on December 31, 2050.
-
*AB403_R1*

– 6 –
Sec. 5. The ballot page assemblies and the paper ballots to be
used in voting on the question must present the question in
substantially the following form:
Shall the Sales and Use Tax Act of 1955 be amended to
exempt from the taxes imposed by this Act on the gross
receipts from the sale and the storage, use or other
consumption of tangible personal property, the amount of any
allowance against the selling price given by a retailer for the
value of a used portable electronic taken in trade on the
purchase of another portable electronic?
 
Yes No
Sec. 6. The explanation of the question which must appear on
each paper ballot and sample ballot and in every publication and
posting of notice of the question must be in substantially the
following form:

(Explanation of Question)
The proposed amendment to the Sales and Use Tax Act of
1955 would exempt from the taxes imposed by this Act on
the gross receipts from the sale and the storage, use or other
consumption of tangible personal property, the amount of any
allowance against the selling price given by a retailer for the
value of a used portable electronic taken in trade on the
purchase of another portable electronic if the amount of
the allowance is known and provided in full to the customer
at the time of purchase and stated on the sales receipt and the
trade-in and purchase occur as part of a single,
contemporaneous transaction. If this proposal is adopted, the
Legislature has provided that the Local School Support Tax
Law and certain analogous taxes on retail sales will be
amended to provide the same exemption.
Sec. 7. If a majority of the votes cast on the question is yes,
the amendment to the Sales and Use Tax Act of 1955 becomes
effective on January 1, 2027, and expires by limitation on
December 31, 2050. If less than a majority of votes cast on the
question is yes, the question fails and the amendment to the Sales
and Use Tax Act of 1955 does not become effective.
Sec. 8. All general election laws not inconsistent with this act
are applicable.
Sec. 9. Any informalities, omissions or defects in the content
or making of the publications, proclamations or notices provided for
in this act and by the general election laws under which this election
is held must be so construed as not to invalidate the adoption of the
act by a majority of the registered voters voting on the question if it
-
*AB403_R1*

– 7 –
can be ascertained with reasonable certainty from the official returns
transmitted to the Office of the Secretary of State whether the
proposed amendment was adopted by a majority of those registered
voters.
Sec. 10. Chapter 374 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
“Portable electronic” means an electronic device that is
portable in nature and its accessories.
Sec. 11. NRS 374.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
374.020 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 374.025 to 374.108,
inclusive, and section 10 of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 12. NRS 374.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
374.030 1. “Gross receipts” means the total amount of the
sale or lease or rental price, as the case may be, of the retail sales of
retailers, valued in money, whether received in money or otherwise,
without any deduction on account of any of the following:
(a) The cost of the property sold. However, in accordance with
such rules and regulations as the Department may prescribe, a
deduction may be taken if the retailer has purchased property for
some other purpose than resale, has reimbursed his or her vendor for
tax which the vendor is required to pay to the county or has paid the
use tax with respect to the property, and has resold the property
before making any use of the property other than retention,
demonstration or display while holding it for sale in the regular
course of business. If such a deduction is taken by the retailer, no
refund or credit will be allowed to his or her vendor with respect to
the sale of the property.
(b) The cost of the materials used, labor or service cost, interest
paid, losses or any other expense.
(c) The cost of transportation of the property before its sale to
the purchaser.
2. The total amount of the sale or lease or rental price includes
all of the following:
(a) Any services that are a part of the sale.
(b) All receipts, cash, credits and property of any kind.
(c) Any amount for which credit is allowed by the seller to the
purchaser.
3. “Gross receipts” does not include any of the following:
(a) Cash discounts allowed and taken on sales.
(b) The sale price of property returned by customers when the
full sale price is refunded either in cash or credit, but this exclusion
does not apply in any instance when the customer, in order to obtain
-
*AB403_R1*

– 8 –
the refund, is required to purchase other property at a price greater
than the amount charged for the property that is returned.
(c) The price received for labor or services used in installing or
applying the property sold.
(d) The amount of any tax, not including any manufacturers’ or
importers’ excise tax, imposed by the United States upon or with
respect to retail sales, whether imposed upon the retailer or the
consumer.
(e) The amount of any allowance against the selling price given
by a retailer for the value of a used vehicle which is taken in trade
on the purchase of another vehicle.
(f) The amount of any allowance against the selling price
given by a retailer for the value of a used portable electronic
which is taken in trade on the purchase of another portable
electronic if:
(1) The amount of the allowance is known and provided in
full to the customer at the time of the purchase;
(2) The amount of the allowance is stated separately on the
sales receipt; and
(3) The trade-in of the used portable electronic and the
purchase of another portable electronic occur as part of a single,
contemporaneous transaction.
4. For purposes of the sales tax, if the retailers establish to the
satisfaction of the Department that the sales tax has been added to
the total amount of the sale price and has not been absorbed by
them, the total amount of the sale price shall be deemed to be the
amount received exclusive of the tax imposed.
Sec. 13. NRS 374.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
374.070 1. “Sales price” means the total amount for which
tangible property is sold, valued in money, whether paid in money
or otherwise, without any deduction on account of any of the
following:
(a) The cost of the property sold.
(b) The cost of the materials used, labor or service cost, interest
charged, losses, or any other expenses.
(c) The cost of transportation of the property before its purchase.
2. The total amount for which property is sold includes all of
the following:
(a) Any services that are a part of the sale.
(b) Any amount for which credit is given to the purchaser by the
seller.
3. “Sales price” does not include any of the following:
(a) Cash discounts allowed and taken on sales.
(b) The amount charged for property returned by customers
when the entire amount charged therefor is refunded in cash or
-
*AB403_R1*

– 9 –
credit, except that this exclusion does not apply in any instance
when the customer, in order to obtain the refund, is required to
purchase other property at a price greater than the amount charged
for the property that is returned.
(c) The amount charged for labor or services rendered in
installing or applying the property sold.
(d) The amount of any tax, not including any manufacturers’ or
importers’ excise tax, imposed by the United States upon or with
respect to retail sales, whether imposed upon the retailer or the
consumer.
(e) The amount of any tax imposed by the State of Nevada upon
or with respect to the storage, use or other consumption of tangible
personal property purchased from any retailer.
(f) The amount of any allowance against the selling price given
by a retailer for the value of a used vehicle or vessel which is taken
in trade on the purchase of another vehicle or vessel.
(g) The amount of any allowance against the selling price
given by a retailer for the value of a used portable electronic
which is taken in trade on the purchase of another portable
electronic if:
(1) The amount of the allowance is known and provided in
full to the customer at the time of the purchase;
(2) The amount of the allowance is stated separately on the
sales receipt; and
(3) The trade-in of the used portable electronic and the
purchase of another portable electronic occur as part of a single,
contemporaneous transaction.
Sec. 14. 1. This section and sections 1 to 9, inclusive, of this
act become effective on October 1, 2025.
2. Sections 10 to 13, inclusive, of this act become effective on
January 1, 2027, and expire by limitation on December 31, 2050,
only if the proposal submitted pursuant to sections 2 to 9, inclusive,
of this act is approved by the voters at the General Election on
November 3, 2026.
H
-
*AB403_R1*